src/morphology/stemparts/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_LUODES


0:des   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:des   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tee N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:te N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:des   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_LÄHDES


0:des   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:des   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tee N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:te N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:des   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KANGAS


0:gas   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kaa N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ka N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:gas   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kaa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ka N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ka N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ka N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ka N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ka N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:gas   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kaa   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KÖNGÄS


0:gäs   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kää N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:kä N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:gäs   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:kää N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:kä N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:kä N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:kä N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:kä N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:kä N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:gäs   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kää   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_HAMMAS


0:mas   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:paa N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pa N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:mas   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:paa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:pa N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:pa N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:pa N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:mas   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:paa   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_ALLAS


0:las   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:taa N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ta N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:las   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:taa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ta N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ta N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ta N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:las   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:taa   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KINNAS


0:nas   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:taa N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ta N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:nas   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:taa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ta N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ta N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ta N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:nas   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:taa   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_RYNNÄS


0:näs   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tää N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:tä N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:näs   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tää N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:tä N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:tä N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:tä N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:tä N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:tä N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:näs   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tää   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PORRAS


0:ras   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:taa N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ta N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ras   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:taa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ta N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ta N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ta N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ras   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:taa   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;



LEXICON N_MIES


0:s   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:he    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:h     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:s       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:he    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:h     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s       N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:h     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:h     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:he  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
0:h   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;







LEXICON N_OLUT





0:t   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_NEITSYT


0:t   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_IMMYT



0:myt   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pye N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:py N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:myt   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:pye N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:py N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:py N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:py N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:py N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:py N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:myt   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pye   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:py   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:py   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;



LEXICON N_KAARET



0:t   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_HÄMET



0:t   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KEVÄT



0:t   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:ä N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;


LEXICON N_KORTET



0:tet   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ttee N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tte N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:tet   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:ttee N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:tte N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:tte N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:tte N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:tte N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:tte N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tet   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ttee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tte   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:tte   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_LOUET



0:et   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kee N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:et   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kee N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:ke N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ke N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:et   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_INGET



0:get   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kee N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:get   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:kee N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:ke N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:ke N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:get   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_AHDET



0:det   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:det   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tee N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:te N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:det   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_LÄHDET



0:det   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:det   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tee N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:te N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:det   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_VUOLLET



0:let   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:let   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tee N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:te N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:let   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_LANNET



0:net   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:net   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tee N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:te N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:net   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;


LEXICON N_RINNET



0:net   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:net   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tee N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:te N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:net   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KAARRET



0:ret   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ret   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tee N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:te N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ret   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_VIIRRET



0:ret   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:te N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ret   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tee N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:te N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ret   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_AIVOKUOLLUT



0:ut  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ee   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ut      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:ee   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN    ;
0:e    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:e    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:e    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ut  N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ee  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_SIVISTYNYT


0:yt  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:yt      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:ee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:yt  N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ee  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
